Arkansas, session 2025, HB1939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-17-413, concerning yearly incentive
bonuses for certain teachers with National Board for Professional Teaching
Standards certification funding, is amended to add an additional subsection
to read as follows:
(g) A person shall not be qualified to receive funds under this
section if he or she has not satisfied the requirements of this section by
July 1, 2025.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2805(c), concerning summative
*TNL328*
03/21/2025 2:05:12 PM TNL328

HB1939
evaluations under the Teacher Excellence and Support System, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) A summative evaluation shall:
(1) Result in a written an evaluation determination, which may
be done in writing or digitally, for the teacher's performance on all
evaluation domains as a whole;
(2) Use the evaluation framework and evaluation rubric
appropriate to the teacher's role;
(3)(A) Use multiple sources of evidence of the teacher's
professional practice including direct observation, indirect observation,
artifacts, and data.
(B) Subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section does not require
that every component of the domains be evidenced by artifacts when
observation or data is used.
(C) A school or school district may adopt policies to:
(i) Incorporate peer observations and student
feedback that contribute to the summative rating; and
(ii) Substitute for the whole or any part of the
summative evaluation any part of a teacher's work completed for the
certification or renewal of a certification from the National Board for
Professional Teaching Standards;
(4) Include presentations of evidence chosen by the teacher, the
evaluator, or both;
(5) Provide an opportunity for the evaluator and teacher to
discuss the review of evidence used in the evaluation; and
(6) Provide feedback based on the evaluation rubric that the
teacher can use to improve teaching skills and student learning.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2805, concerning summative evaluations
under the Teacher Excellence and Support System, is amended to add additional
subsections to read as follows:
(e) In a year in which a public school does not perform a summative
evaluation, the public school shall perform an annual rating that satisfies
the requirements of the Merit Teacher Incentive Fund Program under § 6-17-
2901 et seq.
(f) As used in this section, "annual rating" means a formative or
03/21/2025 2:05:12 PM TNL328

HB1939
summative rating given at the end of each school year that is based on
observations, which may be based on a teacher's professional growth plan, and
that includes without limitation components within an evaluation framework as
reported in the state-approved evaluation system.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2904(a), concerning eligibility for an
award from the Merit Teacher Incentive Fund Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) Eligibility for an award from the Merit Teacher Incentive Fund
Program shall include without limitation:
(1)(A) A teacher who demonstrates outstanding growth in student
performance, as determined by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education.
(B)(i) In determining whether a teacher has demonstrated
outstanding growth in student performance, the division shall calculate a
value-added growth model score for grades and subjects, where possible.
(ii) The division shall develop rules to establish
the process and procedure for public school districts to annually report data
related to value-added models that includes without limitation:
(a) Student test scores; and
(b) Prior student performance by subject and
school.
(C) A public school district shall perform an annual
rating at the end of each school year based on observations, which may be
based on a teacher's professional growth plan, and that includes without
limitation components within an evaluation framework as reported in the
state-approved evaluation system;
(2) Teachers serving as mentors to aspiring teachers;
(3) Aspiring teachers participating in yearlong residencies;
(4) Teachers instructing in subject areas or geographical areas
identified as experiencing a critical shortage of teachers, including public
schools that have historically been understaffed, as determined by the
division; and
(5) Other categories as defined by the state board State Board
of Education.

03/21/2025 2:05:12 PM TNL328